Tennessee, session 114, HB0463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-903, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (f):
(1) Notwithstanding this section, § 8-35-109, or another law to the contrary, the
board of trustees shall convert a person's participation in the retirement system, for
service as a member of the general assembly and as a participant in the hybrid plan,
from the hybrid plan to the legacy plan upon the person completing ten (10) years of
service as a member of the general assembly if the person became a member of the
general assembly on or after July 1, 2014. The board shall provide written notification to
the member after the conversion from the hybrid plan to the legacy plan is completed.
(2) The office of legislative administration shall notify the board of trustees upon
a member of the general assembly completing ten (10) years of service as a member of
the general assembly.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-208(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the following language:
The right to continue coverage under the state employees group insurance plan
provided under this section shall not apply to any senator, representative, governor, or
their dependents, when first election to any of these offices did not occur before July 1,
2015.
HB0463
000894
- 1 -

and substituting instead the following:
The right to continue coverage under the state employees group insurance plan
provided under this section shall not apply to the governor, or the governor's
dependents, when first election to the office did not occur before July 1, 2015.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-205, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, the retiree coverage authorized
under this section must be made available to any retired senator or representative who
completes ten (10) years of service as a member of the general assembly on or after
July 1, 2024.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-209, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, the supplemental medical
insurance benefit authorized under this section must be made available to any retired
senator or representative who completes ten (10) years of service as a member of the
general assembly on or after July 1, 2024.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to persons completing ten (10) years of service as a member of the general assembly
on or after July 1, 2024.
- 2 - 000894